Hawaii statutes.
§189-4 Penalties. (a) Any person
violating any of the provisions of this chapter for which a penalty is not
otherwise provided, or any rule of the department adopted thereunder, shall be
guilty of a petty misdemeanor and punishable as provided in subsection (b);
provided that in the case of a corporation violating any of the provisions only
the fine shall be imposed, but any officer of the corporation who wilfully
procures or permits the violation of the provisions by the corporation shall be
punishable as in the case of an individual violating the same.

(b) The punishment, in addition to any other
penalties, shall be a fine of not less than:

(1) $250 for a first offense;

(2) $500 for a second offense;

(3) $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense.

(c) The fines specified in this section shall
not be suspended or waived. [L 1929, c 187, §5; RL 1935, §334; RL 1945, §1259;
am L 1947, c 39, §5; am L 1949, c 272, §5; am L 1955, c 96, §5; RL 1955,
§21-114; HRS §189-4; am L 1981, c 85, §81; am L 1999, c 195, §7]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next